Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 14 Special Event Use Permits

3-14-1.
Authority and requirements for special event use permits.

The commissioner may issue a special event use permit for the sale of alcoholic beverages for certain events which would otherwise require a retailer or retail dealers license. The commissioner shall specify by rule or regulation the events that shall qualify for a special event use permit; provided, however, that estate sales, the sale of inventory authorized under a bankruptcy proceeding, and activities that are similar in nature shall so qualify. Such permit shall not be valid for more than ten days.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-14-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 827, § 7/HB 1066.